Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-221
Watercourses; surface waters; regulation.

A city of the first class may establish, alter, and change the channel of watercourses, and wall and cover them over. No city shall be liable in damages on account of the accumulations of surface waters which fall upon its site, or any portion thereof, unless such accumulations be caused by the act of a city officer while employed in his or her official capacity and by authorization of the mayor and city council first entered of record.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, XXVIII, p. 253;

Laws 1907, c. 13, § 1, p. 110;

R.S.1913, § 4837;

C.S.1922, § 4005;

C.S.1929, § 16-222;

R.S.1943, § 16-221;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 27.

Courts by injunction will prevent a village from accumulating surface waters upon its site or any portion thereof and discharging it by ditches upon lands of another. Andrews v. Village of Steele City, 2 Neb. Unof. 676, 89 N.W. 739 (1902).